Illinois, session 104th, SB1059.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Southwestern Illinois Development Authority 5Act is amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (70 ILCS 520/1)  (from Ch. 85, par. 6151)7    Sec. 1. This Act shall be known and and may be cited as the 8"Southwestern Illinois Development Authority Act".9(Source: P.A. 85-591.)